Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2022.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 631.2. Coverage for Scalp Cooling Systems.--(a) Each health insurance policy that is offered, issued or renewed in this Commonwealth and that provides hospital, surgical, medical, major medical or similar comprehensive coverage for cancer chemotherapy treatment shall include coverage for scalp 12345678910111213141516171819202122 cooling system treatment.(b) Coverage under this section shall be subject to:(1) the deductible, copayment and coinsurance conditions applied to cancer chemotherapy treatment; and(2) the terms and conditions specified in the health insurance policy, if the terms and conditions are consistent with this section.(c) As used in this section:"Health insurance policy" means a policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan issued by an insurer that provides medical or health care coverage. The term does not include any of the following:(1) An accident only policy.(2) A credit only policy.(3) A long-term care or disability income policy.(4) A specified disease policy.(5) A Medicare supplement policy.(6) A fixed indemnity policy.(7) A dental only policy.(8) A vision only policy.(9) A workers' compensation policy.(10) An automobile medical payment policy.(11) A policy under which benefits are provided by the Federal Government to active or former military personnel and their dependents.(12) A hospital indemnity policy.(13) Any other similar policy providing for limited benefits."Insurer" means an entity that is licensed by the Insurance Department to offer, issue or renew a health insurance policy 20250HB2022PN2581 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and that is governed under any of the following:(1) This act, including section 630 and Article XXIV.(2) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the "Health Maintenance Organization Act."(3) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations)."Scalp cooling system treatment" means treatment using a device that cools the human scalp to prevent or reduce hair loss during cancer chemotherapy treatment, if the device is designed and intended for repeated use and is primarily and customarily used to serve a medical purpose. The term includes treatment using a cold cap or a refrigerated scalp cooling system.Section 2. This act shall apply as follows:(1) For health insurance policies for which either rates or forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, the addition of section 631.2 of the act shall apply to any policy for which a form or rate is first filed on or after the effective date of this paragraph.(2) For health insurance policies for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, the addition of section 631.2 of the act shall apply to any policy issued or renewed on or after 120 days after the effective date of this paragraph.(3) For medical assistance and Children's Health Insurance Program managed care plans, the addition of section 631.2 of the act shall apply beginning January 1, 2027, or 60 days after the effective date of this paragraph, whichever is later.20250HB2022PN2581 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2022PN2581 - 4 - 1